Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 6

Sale Or Other Disposition Of State Lands

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2009, No. 1381, § 23, provided: “SELL, LEASE, RENT, CONVEY OR ENCUMBER RAY WINDER FIELD. In no event shall the Department of Human Services, or any of its governing boards, sell, lease, rent, convey or encumber the land and facilities of Ray Winder Field in Little Rock, Arkansas without the prior review and approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.”

Cross References.

Deed fee for state land commissioner, §21-6-203.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1859, No. 154, § 7: effective on passage.

Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 53, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1881, No. 26, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1885, No. 10, § 7: effective on passage.

Acts 1887, No. 90, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1919, No. 226, § 3: Mar. 11, 1919. Emergency declared.

Acts 1919, No. 344, § 8: effective on passage. Emergency declared. Approved Mar. 22, 1919.

Acts 1941, No. 35, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1943, No. 206, § 5: Mar. 15, 1943. Emergency clause provided: “Because of the clouding of many titles to real estate throughout the state, resulting in long delays in sales and loans, an emergency is found and hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1945, No. 292, § 3: Mar. 20, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “It is found that thousands of Arkansas men and women in the armed forces are being discharged and that many of them might desire to avail themselves of the opportunity to purchase state-owned tax forfeited lands for the purpose of establishing homes, therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1959, No. 305, § 3: Mar. 26, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly that existing law does not adequately provide the retention in the state of the mineral rights when the state or any of its agencies dispose of state-owned land; that the failure to retain such rights will cause irreparable harm to the state and its agencies through the loss of funds which otherwise would be available for making sorely-needed improvements at the State Hospital and the state's other institutions; and that only by the provisions of this act, and the immediate effectiveness thereof, may the aforesaid conditions be alleviated. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force on and after the date of its passage and approval.”

22-6-101. Record of land sales.

(a)

In addition to the memorandum of sales or entry of lands to be made upon the maps or plats, the Commissioner of State Lands shall procure a well-bound book in which he or she shall enter each location or purchase of lands and in which he or she shall specify the tract sold, to whom sold, the date of sale, and the price and how paid.

(b)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall always discriminate the class to which the lands sold belong.

(c)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall make to the Auditor of State quarterly reports of the transactions of his or her office. These reports shall show the class of lands, the number of acres, the price per acre, the amount paid and the kind of funds so paid, together with a report of fees certified to the Treasurer of State by the Commissioner of State Lands.

History.

Acts 1853, §§ 15, 20, p. 161; 1887, No. 90, § 4, p. 140; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6583, 6588; Pope's Dig., §§ 8614, 8619; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-506, 10-507, 10-531.

22-6-102. Correction of errors growing out of erroneous sales.

(a)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall have the power to correct errors that exist or may exist arising from the erroneous sale of lands belonging or formerly belonging to the state.

(b)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall have the power to correct all manifest errors in the description of lands sold, in the amounts of notes given for lands sold by the state, and also in cases where notes may have been given for the purchase of a greater number of acres than has been confirmed to the state.

(c)

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner of State Lands to maintain a record of errors existing in the sales of swamp and overflowed lands.

(d)

Certified extracts from the record shall be received as evidence in any court of this state.

(e)

In all cases where lands have been erroneously confirmed to the state and sold by it, twice sold by commissioners, sold by them when the lands were unconfirmed or misdescribed, in whole or in part, or when the sales are in any way irregular, informal, or incomplete, the Commissioner of State Lands shall issue a certificate or take steps to perfect the entry or to enable the purchasers, their heirs, or assigns to have refunded to them any money which they may have paid on any entry that is void or voidable.

(f)

In all cases where by any reason the State of Arkansas shall be unable to make title to any purchaser of state lands, it shall be lawful for the Commissioner of State Lands to issue a refunding certificate for the amount received from the purchase which shall have been paid into the State Treasury.

(g)

The Auditor of State, upon examination of the certificate, if he or she finds that the certificate is properly issued and that the money has been paid into the State Treasury, shall draw his or her warrant upon the Treasurer of State therefor.

(h)

The Commissioner of State Lands, on production of proof satisfactory to him or her, may correct errors and put land in a situation to have deeds thereon made.

(i)

The action of the Commissioner of State Lands shall be final unless set aside by judgment or decree of a court having competent jurisdiction thereof.

(j)(1)

The Commissioner of State Lands may furnish a person with a statement of any amounts that may be due in order to perfect any entry or purchase to be paid directly into the State Treasury, or he or she may issue a warrant for any amount due, after issuing a refunding certificate.

(2)

For such service, the Commissioner of State Lands shall be allowed such fees as allowed by law.

(k)

Any action to correct errors on the part of the Commissioner of State Lands shall be legal and binding until overruled or set aside by the decision of a court having competent jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1854, § 3, p. 13; 1859, No. 154, §§ 1-5, 7, p. 182; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6764, 6766-6771; Pope's Dig., §§ 8696, 8698-8703; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-508 — 10-514.

22-6-103. Issuance of replacement certificates of purchase.

The Commissioner of State Lands shall issue certificates of purchase only in cases in which it shall appear by the records that no certificates have ever been issued and in cases where the affidavit of the applicant, or some person for him or her, shall be filed stating that the original certificate had not been assigned or that it has been lost or destroyed.

History.

Acts 1854, § 2, p. 13; C. & M. Dig., § 6763; Pope's Dig., § 8695; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-520.

22-6-104. Execution of deed on original or patent certificate.

(a)

The owner of any original or patent certificate for any seminary, saline, internal improvements, swamp and overflowed, real estate bank, or state bank lands, or the assignee or the parties in whom the legal title to the land exists, may present the certificate to the Commissioner of State Lands, who, if he or she finds that the sale of the land was made in conformity to law and that the land has been fully paid for, shall execute, under his or her hand and official seal, a deed conveying all rights, title, and interest of the state thereto.

(b)

The seal of the Commissioner of State Lands shall be sufficient verification and authentication of the deed so made and shall entitle the deed to record, which shall be received as evidence in any court of this state.

(c)

The original or patent certificates upon which deeds are made shall be filed in the Commissioner of State Lands' office, and the Commissioner of State Lands shall keep an abstract of the deeds so made, from which he or she may issue duplicates upon sufficient proof of the loss of original deeds.

(d)

In all cases where sufficient proof is presented of the loss or destruction of any deeds made to any lands belonging to this state, by any officer authorized so to do, where evidence exists in the Commissioner of State Lands' office of the issuance of the former deeds, it shall be the duty of the Commissioner of State Lands to issue duplicates or make new deeds therefor, as the case may be, referring therein to the deeds previously issued.

(e)

The duplicates or new deeds shall have the like force and effect as the original deeds.

History.

Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 53, §§ 1, 2, p. 91; 1881, No. 26, § 1, p. 40; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6759, 6760; Pope's Dig., §§ 8691, 8692; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-521, 10-522.

22-6-105. Execution of deed on certificate of purchase.

(a)

The owner of any certificate of purchase for any swamp and overflowed, seminary, saline, internal improvement, real estate bank, or state bank lands, or the assignee or the party in whom the legal title to the lands exist, may present the certificates and other evidences of the legal title to the lands to the Commissioner of State Lands. If the Commissioner of State Lands finds that the sale of the lands was in conformity to law, the lands have been fully paid for, and the evidences of assignment have been made in accordance with law, he or she shall execute, under his or her hand and official seal, a deed conveying all the right, title, and interest of the state in and to the lands.

(b)

The deed of the state shall not be issued to any approved swamp and overflowed lands until after the issuance of the patent by the United States to the state for the lands.

History.

Acts 1885, No. 10, § 3, p. 10; C. & M. Dig., § 6591; Pope's Dig., § 8622; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-524.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1885, No. 10, § 7, provided that nothing in the act should be construed to repeal the act of Dec. 15, 1875, which enabled settlers and preemptors on the swamp and overflowed lands to perfect their titles by entry or the act of Mar. 18, 1879, which authorized the sale of swamp lands in certain cases.

22-6-106. Issuance of deed on proof of payment.

The Commissioner of State Lands is authorized and empowered to execute, under his or her hand and official seal, a deed to purchasers from the state of any seminary, saline, internal improvement, real estate bank, or state bank lands, upon the filing in his or her office of the receipts of the Treasurer of State, showing that the purchase money for the lands, together with the fee for the deed, has been fully paid to the Treasurer of State as required by law.

History.

Acts 1885, No. 10, § 1, p. 10; C. & M. Dig., § 6589; Pope's Dig., § 8620; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-523.

Publisher's Notes.

As to construction of Acts 1885, No. 10, see Publisher's Notes to §22-6-105.

22-6-107. Deeds to school lands sold prior to 1881.

(a)

The Commissioner of State Lands is authorized and empowered to execute, under his or her hand and official seal, a deed to purchasers or their assigns or legal representatives of sixteenth section or school lands, upon presentation to the Commissioner of State Lands of proper evidence of full payment for the lands, in all cases where the sale of the land occurred prior to the passage of “An act to provide for the sale of the sixteenth section in this State”, approved March 22, 1881.

(b)

The certificates and evidences of assignment mentioned in subsection (a) of this section, upon which deeds are so made, shall be filed in the Commissioner of State Lands' office. He or she shall keep a record of the deeds so made, from which he or she may issue duplicates upon sufficient proof of loss of, or errors in, the original deeds.

(c)

In all cases where sufficient proof is presented of the loss, destruction, or erroneous issue of any deeds made to any lands belonging to the state by any officer authorized so to do, when evidence exists in the Commissioner of State Lands' office of the proper issuance of the former deeds, it shall be the duty of the Commissioner of State Lands to issue duplicates or make new deeds, as the case may be, referring therein to the deeds previously issued.

(d)

The duplicates or new deeds shall have the like force and effect as the original deeds.

History.

Acts 1885, No. 10, §§ 2, 5, p. 10; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6590, 6593; Pope's Dig., §§ 8621, 8627; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-525, 10-526.

Publisher's Notes.

As to construction of Acts 1885, No. 10, see Publisher's Notes to §22-6-105.

For prior laws relating to the execution of deeds to school lands, see Acts 1869 (Adj. Sess.), No. 93, §§ 10, 11, p. 190, and Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 80, p. 155.

22-6-108. Seal of Commissioner of State Lands sufficient verification.

The seal of the Commissioner of State Lands shall be sufficient verification and authentication of the deed made by him or her for any class of lands mentioned in this act, and the deed shall be received as evidence of the legal title to the lands in any court in this state.

History.

Acts 1885, No. 10, § 6, p. 10; C. & M. Dig., § 6594; Pope's Dig., § 8628; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-527.

Publisher's Notes.

As to construction of Acts 1885, No. 10, see Publisher's Notes to §22-6-105.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1885, No. 10, codified as §§22-6-105 —22-6-108.

22-6-109. Cancellation of deed upon dishonor of check.

(a)

The Commissioner of State Lands is empowered and authorized to cancel, set aside, and hold for naught any redemption or sale deed issued by him or her for any state-owned land in any instance where a personal check tendered to and accepted by him or her in payment of the redemption or purchase price thereof is not paid upon presentation to the bank upon which it is drawn.

(b)

Upon failure of payment, the Commissioner of State Lands may issue a cancellation deed cancelling and setting aside the redemption or sale deed and shall file the cancellation deed for record in the county in which the lands are located and pay the expense incident thereto from the maintenance fund of the office of the Commissioner of State Lands.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 35, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-504, 10-505.

22-6-110. Confirmation of sales of lands paid for with levee bonds.

(a)

All sales of lands formerly owned by the State of Arkansas conducted pursuant to the decrees of the Pulaski County Chancery Court in favor of the State of Arkansas, condemning the lands for sale to pay the unpaid purchase price thereof, which sales were held and conducted by the commissioner of the court in substantial conformity to the decrees, were reported to and were approved and confirmed by the court, and were made for a price payable in Arkansas levee bonds to May 1, 1878, are ratified and confirmed and made valid as if the lands had been paid for in valid funds.

(b)

When the owner and occupant of any of the lands shall present to the Commissioner of State Lands a duly certified copy of the proceedings of the court affecting the lands claimed by him or her and showing that the land was sold prior to May 1, 1878, and paid for in Arkansas levee bonds and that the sale was approved and confirmed by the court, and when the owner shall file a petition with the Commissioner of State Lands setting forth the evidence of his or her title, showing title derived by him or her from the purchaser at the sale so held under decree of the court prior to May 1, 1878, and showing that the claimant and those under whom he or she claims title have continuously paid taxes on the lands for at least seven (7) years immediately preceding the filing of the petition, it shall be the duty of the Commissioner of State Lands to execute to the record owner a deed in the name of the State of Arkansas, quieting all the right, title, and claim of the State of Arkansas in the land claimed and held by each owner.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 226, §§ 1, 2; C. & M. Dig., § 6785; Pope's Dig., § 8710; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-528, 10-529.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Ark. Const., Amend. 80, adopted by voter referendum and effective July 1, 2001, abolished chancery courts and established circuit courts as the trial courts of original jurisdiction. The jurisdiction of the circuit courts now includes “all matters previously cognizable by Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Court….”

22-6-111. Price of swamp, internal improvement, seminary, saline, or school lands — Exemptions.

(a)(1)

No swamp, internal improvement, seminary, or saline lands shall be sold for less than two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per acre, and no state school land shall be sold for less than two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per acre nor for less than the market value ascertained by appraisement.

(2)

When any lands or interest therein may be recovered by the state by litigation, the lands or interest shall be ordered sold by the court as in sales of land upon decree in equity.

(3)

After paying expenses, the balance of the purchase money shall be deposited into the State Treasury, as provided in §§6-20-202 and6-20-203.

(b)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the donation of state lands as provided by law.

(c)

Nothing in this section or §§22-6-301 —22-6-304 shall prevent the Commissioner of State Lands from accepting outstanding refunding certificates issued by the state for lands previously sold in payment for state lands.

(d)

Nothing in this section or §§22-6-301 —22-6-304 shall affect the sale of any state lands where written application was filed with the Commissioner of State Lands prior to February 1, 1919.

(e)

Nothing in this section or §§22-6-301 —22-6-304 shall affect the law in regard to the sale by the state of tax-forfeited lands.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 344, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 9009; Acts 1921, No. 350, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8626; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-502.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1919, No. 344, § 7, provided that nothing in that act would be construed to prevent the redemption of lands and town and city lots under §§26-37-310 and26-37-311 or subsequent laws.

22-6-112. Preference to war veterans in sale of agricultural land.

In the disposition of state-owned tracts of lands suitable for agriculture, the Commissioner of State Lands shall give first preference, where they are qualified as farmers, to war veterans who have been bona fide citizens of this state for five (5) years or more, who have been in active military service in time of war for ninety (90) days or more, and who have been discharged or relieved therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 292, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-501.

22-6-113. State's retention of mineral interest — Exemption.

(a)

Irrespective of any other law on the subject, in any conveyance of title to lands owned by the State of Arkansas, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the state shall retain ownership of not less than one-half (½) interest in and to all the oil, gas, and other minerals therein or thereunder.

(b)

The provisions of this section shall not affect the provisions of law governing the sale of tax-forfeited lands by the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 305, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-532, 10-533.

22-6-114. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the list of lands sold furnished to county clerks, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1463, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1887, No. 90, § 1, p. 140; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6587, 9925; Pope's Dig., §§ 8618, 13692; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-530.

22-6-115. Prohibited acts of county officials affecting title.

(a)

No county clerk, county assessor, sheriff, or other county official shall file or prepare and issue any type of deed, mortgage, lease, or other legal document, nor shall he or she extend and assess any taxes on state or political subdivision lands for any type of taxes, nor shall he or she include any such lands on any delinquent list, without first notifying the state or the department owning the lands by registered letter, return receipt requested, sixty (60) days prior to taking such action, setting forth the proposed action to be taken and including a complete legal description of the lands.

(b)

Any action taken without complying with the requirements of this section shall be declared null, void, and invalid, as against the state or political subdivision thereof, in any court having jurisdiction of the cause.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 727, §§ 1, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-534, 10-535.

22-6-116. Certificates by county collectors correcting or cancelling original certificates.

(a)

When any county collector shall determine that the original certification to the Commissioner of State Lands of any lands, or town or city lots, should be cancelled, corrected, or in any way changed, said official shall issue a certificate to the Commissioner of State Lands. Such certificate shall contain the legal description of the property, state the change, and state the appropriate manner in which to make such change.

(b)

Upon receipt of any cancellation or correction certificate, the Commissioner of State Lands shall determine whether the certificate offers sufficient evidence to warrant cancellation or correction of the certification of any real property. If the Commissioner of State Lands determines that cancellation or correction is warranted, the Commissioner of State Lands shall approve the cancellation or correction certificate, amend the records of the Commissioner of State Lands, forward the certificate to the county collector, and the certificate shall be filed with the recorder of the county and properly recorded in the deed records. A recorded copy of such certificate shall be transmitted to any other county officials upon whose records the parcel is recorded.

(c)

Whenever a cancellation or correction certificate has been recorded in the records of the Commissioner of State Lands, the Commissioner of State Lands shall issue a cancellation or correction deed on property which has been redeemed, sold, or otherwise disposed of as tax-forfeited land. The Commissioner of State Lands shall forward the deed to be filed in the county where the property is located.

(d)

No recording fee shall be charged by or against the recorder on any cancellation or correction certificate or on any cancellation or correction deed issued by the Commissioner of State Lands.

(e)

When any county assessor shall determine that the information on tax-delinquent parcels is erroneous, whether by legal description, name of record owner, double assessment, or other cause, the assessor shall inform the county collector of such change, and the county collector shall forward a cancellation or correction certificate to the Commissioner of State Lands as specified in subsection (a) of this section.

(f)

Should information contained in the records of the Commissioner of State Lands be found to be erroneous, whether by legal description, name of record owner, or other cause, the Commissioner of State Lands may, at his or her discretion, waive all or part of penalties and interests applied thereon as a result of the inaccuracies.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 206, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-517 — 10-519; Acts 1989, No. 538, § 1; 1991, No. 807, § 1.

22-6-117. Report to Legislative Council — Definition.

(a)

For purposes of this section and §22-6-118, “quarter” means:

(1)

January 1 through March 31 of each year;

(2)

April 1 through June 30 of each year;

(3)

July 1 through September 30 of each year; and

(4)

October 1 through December 31 of each year.

(b)

When any agency of this state or agent of this state conveys any interest in real property or natural resources owned by this state, the agent or agency shall report the conveyance to the Legislative Council no later than thirty (30) days after the end of the quarter during which the conveyance occurred.

(c)

The report of conveyance shall include:

(1)

The parties to the conveyance;

(2)

The date of the conveyance;

(3)

The location of the property conveyed;

(4)

The compensation received by the state for the conveyance;

(5)

Changes in the lease agreement if the conveyance is a lease; and

(6)

Any other information requested by the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1315, § 1.

22-6-118. Exemptions from § 22-6-117 requirement.

The provisions of this section and §22-6-117 shall not apply to the following:

(1)

Conveyance by the state of tax-delinquent property;

(2)

Leases of state property of a duration of one (1) year or less;

(3)

Leases of state property to state employees for housing;

(4)

Conveyances of state property by one (1) state agency to another state agency; and

(5)

Easements or any lesser estate in land granted by any state agency.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1315, § 2.

22-6-119. Custody of records.

(a)

Books, accounts, records, papers, maps, and documents relating to the functions and powers of the Commissioner of State Lands, including the records and documents used by the historical predecessors of the Commissioner of State Lands, are the property of the state and shall remain in the custody of the Commissioner of State Lands.

(b)(1)

Except for a temporary loan or temporary measures to preserve, protect, or display a deed, map, document, survey, or other record of the Commissioner of State Lands, the deed, map, document, survey, or other record shall not be removed by any person from the office of the Commissioner of State Lands.

(2)(A)

Upon request by an interested party, the Commissioner of State Lands shall deliver to the interested party a certified copy of a document or record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

(B)

The certified copy shall be treated the same as an original document.

(c)

This section does not apply to a document or record:

(1)

That has been conveyed, transferred, or bestowed by the state in the normal course of business or another lawful disposition; or

(2)

In which the state no longer has an interest.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 553, § 1.

22-6-120. Adopt a Document Program.

(a)

The Adopt a Document Program is established to be administered by the Commissioner of State Lands.

(b)(1)

The Commissioner of State Lands may:

(A)

Obtain funding from private donations and charities to protect documents in his or her custody; and

(B)

Sell duplicates or copies of maps, plats, and other documents in his or her possession or in the possession of a state agency.

(2)

The donations, proceeds of sales under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section, and other funds of the Commissioner of State Lands shall be deposited into a cash fund account and used to preserve and protect documents, maps, field notes, and survey records in his or her possession.

(c)

For the sole purpose of managing the Adopt a Document Program, the Commissioner of State Lands is considered an eligible charitable organization under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) for the purpose of preserving historic maps and documents under the custody of the Commissioner of State Lands.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 553, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Islands

Effective Dates.

Acts 1933, No. 25, § 4: approved Feb. 9, 1933. Emergency clause provided: “Because of the fact that considerable confusion exists as to the rights of the state which may be lost or destroyed unless immediately asserted, and this act being necessary for the immediate promotion of the public health, peace and safety, an emergency is hereby declared, and this act shall take effect and be in force immediately after its passage.”

Acts 1959, No. 452, § 5: Mar. 30, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the failure of existing law to require competitive bidding for the class of lands contemplated herein has resulted in a serious loss of revenue to the state and is discriminatory as between buyers of various classes of state lands; that there is urgent need to secure additional revenue and prevent further discrimination as aforesaid; and that enactment of this bill will provide the needed remedy. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

22-6-201. Purpose.

(a)

It is the primary purpose and intent of this subchapter that when islands are formed in navigable waters of this state, title to the islands should be retained in the state if the island is appropriate for use by any state agency or may become appropriate for any use by the state and that the islands should be sold by the state only when it is determined that they have no present or future use to the state.

(b)

It is not the purpose of this subchapter to require any state agency to accept the responsibility and duty for the operation, management, or development of any island but only that appropriate state agencies, as determined by the Commissioner of State Lands, shall have an opportunity to assume control over the islands.

(c)

It is also the intent of this subchapter that when any state agency accepts the duties and responsibility of operating, managing, or developing any island, the agency shall have the authority to permit and regulate activities upon the lands, including the cutting of timber. The agency may use or permit the use of the lands for such purposes as it shall deem appropriate.

(d)

It is further the intent of this subchapter to establish the policy that all submerged lands following the navigable waterways of this state shall remain in the state domain. “Submerged lands” shall be those lands found at and below the line of ordinary highwater and shall include, but not be limited to, the beds, channels, chutes, and adjoining areas of rivers, lakes, and streams.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 148, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-613; Acts 1991, No. 807, § 2.

22-6-202. Title and administration of islands and submerged lands.

(a)

Except as provided in §22-6-204, islands formed or that may form in the navigable waters of this state are the property of the state and subject to sale and disposition in the manner and form provided in this subchapter.

(b)

The Commissioner of State Lands may lease, grant, or sell islands or submerged lands and may promulgate rules to implement this section.

(c)

The construction, alteration, or placement of objects below the ordinary high water mark in a navigable river, stream, or lake shall not be permitted without permission from the Commissioner of State Lands.

(d)

The Commissioner of State Lands may:

(1)

Enter into agreements and partnerships with other agencies to carry out the intent of this section;

(2)

Require the removal of an existing structure that occupies the submerged lands of a navigable stream, river, or lake; or

(3)

Require compensation to the Commissioner of State Lands by the owner for the continued use of submerged lands.

(e)(1)

The Commissioner of State Lands, or at the request of the Commissioner of State Lands, the Attorney General, may institute an action in a court with proper venue and subject matter jurisdiction over submerged lands or the Pulaski County Circuit Court to remove a structure or debris resting on the submerged lands of the navigable waters of the state or to enjoin the construction or placement of a structure upon the submerged lands.

(2)

If a court finds that a structure or debris is on the submerged lands of the state without permission from the Commissioner of State Lands, the court may order the owner of the structure or debris to:

(A)

Remove the structure or debris; and

(B)

Pay the expenses of removing the structure or debris.

(3)

If the structure or debris has been removed by the state or a local government, the judge may order the owner to:

(A)

Reimburse the state or local government for the costs of removal; and

(B)

Pay the state or local government its court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 452, §§ 1, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-601, 10-603; Acts 1991, No. 807, § 2; 2013, No. 552, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section catchline and the section.

22-6-203. Disposition.

(a)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall receive requests for conveyance of title to an island previously formed in the navigable waters of this state and not previously disposed of in the manner provided by law.

(b)(1)

The Commissioner of State Lands shall inquire into the terrain and other physical attributes of the island for the purpose of determining which state agency, if any, would be most appropriate for operating, managing, and developing the island.

(2)

Upon making the determination, the Commissioner of State Lands shall notify the agency which it finds to be most appropriate to operate and manage the island and shall determine whether that agency is willing to accept the authority and responsibility for operating and managing the island.

(3)

If that agency is willing to accept the authority and responsibility of operating and managing the island, the Commissioner of State Lands shall hold the state title to the island, and the authority and duty to operate and manage the island shall be vested in the agency.

(4)

If the agency so notified does not desire to accept the responsibility and duty to operate and manage the island, it shall notify the Commissioner of State Lands who shall give the state agency which it deems next most appropriate the option of accepting the authority and responsibility of operating and managing the island.

(c)(1)

When an agency agrees to accept the authority and responsibility of operating and managing an island, the agency shall cause the island to be accurately surveyed, compile field notes, and plat the lands in reference to the adjacent lands by the extension of township, range, and section lines, and the agency shall pay the cost of the survey.

(2)

Upon completion of the survey, a copy shall be filed with the Commissioner of State Lands. Upon payment of one dollar ($1.00) consideration to the Commissioner of State Lands by the agency desiring to accept the authority and responsibility of operating and managing the island, the authority and responsibility shall vest with the agency, and title shall be in the name of the State of Arkansas and held by the Commissioner of State Lands.

(d)

If the Commissioner of State Lands finds that an island is not appropriate for operation, management, or use by any appropriate state agency and if no state agency is desirous of accepting the responsibility and duty of managing and operating the island, the Commissioner of State Lands may, at his or her discretion and if the Commissioner of State Lands determines that the best interest of the state is being served, retain title to the island in the name of the state, or, alternatively, the Commissioner of State Lands may sell the island in a manner prescribed by subsection (e) of this section.

(e)(1)

Whenever the Commissioner of State Lands finds that any island formed in the navigable waters of this state is not appropriate for use by any state agency and if no state agency is desirous of assuming the responsibility and duty of operating and managing the island, the Commissioner of State Lands may accept applications for purchase of the island.

(2)

When the application is filed with the Commissioner of State Lands, the Commissioner of State Lands shall cause the island to be accurately surveyed, compile field notes, and plat the lands in reference to the adjacent lands by the extension of township, range, and section lines.

(3)

Thereafter, the lands shall be appraised and treated in all respects and sold and conveyed by the state in a public manner and as prescribed by the Commissioner of State Lands.

(4)

The cost of the survey of any island made as required by this section shall be added to the purchase price of the island.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 148, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 10-610 — 10-612; Acts 1991, No. 807, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1971, No. 148, § 6, provided in part that the act did not repeal §22-5-403.

22-6-204. Confirmation of prior sales.

(a)

All sales made by the Commissioner of State Lands pursuant to this subchapter prior to July 1, 1991, are confirmed, and the title of all purchases under the deeds from the Commissioner of State Lands are quieted, established, and confirmed.

(b)

The area described in any of the deeds as being conveyed shall extend only to the line of ordinary highwater and shall not extend to the bed or channels of the chutes or adjoining area which lies below the line of ordinary highwater, the title to which formations below the line of ordinary highwater is reserved in the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1933, No. 25, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 10-609; Acts 1991, No. 807, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1933, No. 25, § 2, provided that the title to any island sold under the provisions of Acts 1917, No. 282 [repealed], would extend down to, but not below, the highwater line.

22-6-205. Objects of antiquity on submerged lands property of state — Exceptions — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “object of antiquity” includes without limitation property lost or abandoned for twenty-five (25) years or more.

(b)

An object of antiquity found in the submerged lands of the state and not claimed by the federal government or protected under the Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act, 25 U.S.C. §
3001 et seq., shall be the property of the state and be held in trust by the Commissioner of State Lands.

(c)

A person removing an object of antiquity without permission of the Commissioner of State Lands is guilty of theft of property under §5-36-103.

(d)

The Commissioner of State Lands may:

(1)

Work with state or federal agencies to study, protect, and remove an object of antiquity; and

(2)

Transfer or entrust a state or federal agency or federally recognized Indian tribe to take possession of property removed from submerged lands owned by the state.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 552, § 2.

Subchapter 3

— School Lands

Effective Dates.

Acts 1885, No. 103, § 19: effective on passage.

Acts 1919, No. 344, § 8: effective on passage. Emergency declared. Approved Mar. 22, 1919.